Utah statutes.
17C-1-601.   Annual agency budget -- Fiscal year -- Public hearing required -- Auditor forms -- Requirement to file form.

(1)  Each agency shall prepare and its board adopt an annual budget of revenues and expenditures for the agency for each fiscal year.

(2)  Each annual agency budget shall be adopted:

(a)  for an agency created by a city or town, before June 22; or

(b)  for an agency created by a county, before December 15.

(3)  The agency's fiscal year shall be the same as the fiscal year of the community that created the agency.

(4) (a)  Before adopting an annual budget, each agency board shall hold a public hearing on the annual budget.

(b)  Each agency shall provide notice of the public hearing on the annual budget by:

(i) (A)  publishing at least one notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the agency boundaries, one week before the public hearing; or

(B)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation within the agency boundaries, posting a notice of the public hearing in at least three public places within the agency boundaries; and

(ii) publishing notice on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701, at least one week before the public hearing.

(c)  Each agency shall make the annual budget available for public inspection at least three days before the date of the public hearing.

(5)  The state auditor shall prescribe the budget forms and the categories to be contained in each agency budget, including:

(a)  revenues and expenditures for the budget year;

(b)  legal fees; and

(c)  administrative costs, including rent, supplies, and other materials, and salaries of agency personnel.

(6) (a)  Within 90 days after adopting an annual budget, each agency board shall file a copy of the annual budget with the auditor of the county in which the agency is located, the State Tax Commission, the state auditor, the State Board of Education, and each taxing entity that levies a tax on property from which the agency collects tax increment.

(b)  The requirement of Subsection (6)(a) to file a copy of the annual budget with the state as a taxing entity is met if the agency files a copy with the State Tax Commission and the state auditor.



Amended by Chapter 90, 2010 General Session

